Illinois, session 104th, HB5167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 105-15 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/105-15)7    Sec. 105-15. Weed cutting. 8    (a) The township board may provide for the cutting of 9weeds or grass, the trimming of trees or bushes, the removal of 10nuisance bushes or trees, or the maintenance of a retention 11pond or detention pond on any real estate in residential areas 12in the township no sooner than 7 days after notifying the owner 13or the appropriate property owners association by a means of 14notice listed below mail of the intended weed or grass 15cutting, bush or tree trimming, nuisance bush or tree removal, 16or pond maintenance when the owners of the real estate refuse 17or neglect to cut the weeds or grass, trim the trees or bushes, 18remove the nuisance bushes or trees, or maintain the pond. The 19board may collect from the owners the reasonable cost of 20cutting the weeds or grass, trimming the trees or bushes, 21removing the nuisance bushes or trees, or maintaining the 22pond. The 7-day advance notice required under this Section may 23be served by certified mail, by personal service, or by   HB5167 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19104 TRT 32549 b1posting the notice on the property in a prominent location. 2The service of the notice by posting on the property is legally 3sufficient if the posting and date of the notice are proven by 4introduction of a date-stamped photograph showing the notice 5posted on the property. 6    (b) This cost is a lien upon the real estate affected, 7superior to all other liens and encumbrances except tax liens, 8if within 60 days after the cost and expense is incurred, the 9township or person performing the service by authority of the 10township in his or its own name files a notice of lien in the 11office of the recorder in the county in which the real estate 12is located or in the office of the registrar of titles of the 13county if the real estate affected is registered under the 14Registered Titles (Torrens) Act. The notice shall consist of a 15sworn statement setting out (i) a description of the real 16estate sufficient for its identification, (ii) the amount of 17money representing the cost and expense incurred or payable 18for the service, and (iii) the date or dates when the cost and 19expense was incurred by the township. The lien of the township 20shall not be valid, however, as to any purchaser whose rights 21in and to the real estate have arisen after the weed or grass 22cutting, bush or tree trimming, nuisance bush or tree removal, 23or pond maintenance and before the filing of the notice, and 24the lien of the township shall not be valid as to any 25mortgagee, judgment creditor, or other lienholder whose rights 26in and to the real estate arise before the filing of the   HB5167 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19104 TRT 32549 b1notice. Upon payment of the cost and expense by the owner of or 2persons interested in the property after the notice of lien 3has been filed, the lien shall be released by the township or 4person in whose name the lien has been filed. The release may 5be filed of record as in the case of filing a notice of lien.6    (c) No provision of this Section applies to any nature 7preserve or other area that has been designated as a 8conservation area.9    (d) In addition to any lien or foreclosure action related 10thereto, a township may institute a civil action or proceeding 11to recover the amount of money owed for any service performed 12pursuant to subsection (a). 13(Source: P.A. 96-564, eff. 8-18-09.)